Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 7, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  (1) The Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund is established in the  State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Columbia River Fisheries
Enhancement Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State  Fish and Wildlife Commission
to implement measures that enhance fisheries, advance selective harvest practices,  optimize the
economic benefits of fisheries , improve monitoring and data  regarding fishery-related mortality
and advance native fish conservation directly related to Columbia River fish  management and re-
form adopted by rule of the commission.
(3) The commission  shall annually make available on a website of the commission or
State Department of Fish and Wildlife a summary of the uses of the moneys in the fund.
[(2)] (4) The commission may accept grants,  donations, contributions or gifts from any source for
deposit in the Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund.
[(3)] (5) The Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys accepted by the commission pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Fees collected by the commission under ORS 496.146 (23).
SECTION 2.
 Section 8, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Section 7 , [of this 2013 Act ] chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013,  is repealed  on January
2, [2022] 2026.
(2) The Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement  Fund established under section 7 , [ of this 2013
Act] chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013,  is abolished January 2, [ 2022] 2026.
(3) Any unexpended moneys  remaining in the Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund on
January 2, [ 2022] 2026, shall be transferred to the State Wildlife Fund.
SECTION 3.  ORS 496.146, as amended by section 10, chapter 672, Oregon Laws  2013, section
52, chapter 629, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 8, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, section 4, chapter 100,
Oregon Laws 2018, and section 2, chapter 82, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 59 (SB 59-A) Page 1
496.146. In addition to any other duties or powers provided  by law, the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission:
(1) May accept, from  whatever source, appropriations, gifts or grants of money or other property
for the purposes of  wildlife management, and use such money or property for wildlife management
purposes.
(2) May sell or exchange property owned by  the state and used for wildlife management pur-
poses when the commission determines that such  sale or exchange would be advantageous to the
state wildlife policy and management programs.
(3) May acquire, introduce, propagate and stock wildlife species in  such manner as the com-
mission determines will carry out the state wildlife policy and management programs.
(4) May by rule authorize the issuance  of such licenses, tags and permits for angling, taking,
hunting and trapping  and may prescribe such tagging and sealing procedures as the commission
determines necessary  to carry out the provisions of the wildlife laws or to obtain information for
use in  wildlife management. Permits issued pursuant to this subsection may include special hunting
permits for a person and immediate family members of the person to hunt on land owned by that
person in areas where permits for deer or elk are limited by quota. As used in  this subsection,
“immediate family members” means spouses in a  marriage, parents, brothers, brothers-in-law, sisters,
sisters-in-law, sons, sons-in-law, daughters, daughters-in-law, stepchildren and grandchildren. A
landowner who is qualified to receive landowner preference tags from  the commission may request
two additional tags for providing  public access and two additional tags for wildlife habitat programs.
This request shall be made to the  Access and Habitat Board with supporting evidence that the ac-
cess is significant and the  habitat programs benefit wildlife. The board may recommend that the
commission grant the request. When a landowner is qualified under landowner preference rules
adopted by the commission and receives a controlled hunt tag for that unit or  a landowner prefer-
ence tag for the landowner’s  property and does not use the tag during the regular season, the
landowner may use that tag to take an antlerless animal, when approved by the State  Department
of Fish and Wildlife, to alleviate damage that is presently occurring to the landowner’s property.
(5) May by rule prescribe procedures requiring the holder of any  license, tag or permit issued
pursuant to the wildlife laws to keep  records and make reports concerning the time, manner and
place  of  taking wildlife, the quantities taken and such other information as the commission deter-
mines necessary for proper enforcement  of the wildlife laws or to obtain information for use in
wildlife management.
(6) May establish special hunting and angling areas or seasons in which only persons  less than
18 years of age or over 65 years of age are permitted to hunt or angle.
(7) May acquire by purchase, lease, agreement or gift real  property and all appropriate interests
therein for wildlife management and wildlife-oriented recreation purposes.
(8) May acquire by purchase, lease, agreement, gift, exercise of eminent  domain or otherwise
real property and  all interests therein and establish, operate and maintain thereon public hunting
areas.
(9) May establish and develop wildlife refuge and management  areas and prescribe rules gov-
erning the use of such areas and the use of wildlife refuge and management areas  established and
developed pursuant to any other provision of law.
(10) May by rule  prescribe fees for licenses, tags, permits and applications issued or required
pursuant to the wildlife laws, and user charges for angling, hunting or  other recreational uses of
lands owned or managed by the commission, unless such fees or user charges are otherwise  pre-
scribed by law.  No fee or user charge prescribed by the commission pursuant to this subsection shall
exceed $250.
(11) May enter into contracts with  any person or governmental agency for the development and
encouragement of wildlife research and management programs and projects.
(12) May perform such acts as may be necessary for the establishment and  implementation of
cooperative wildlife management programs with agencies of the federal government.
Enrolled Senate Bill 59 (SB 59-A) Page 2
(13) May  offer and pay rewards for the arrest and conviction of any person who has violated
any of the wildlife laws. No such reward shall exceed $1,000 for any one arrest and conviction.
(14) May by rule prescribe fees  for falconry licenses issued pursuant to the wildlife laws, unless
such fees are otherwise prescribed by law. Fees prescribed by the commission pursuant to  this
subsection shall be based on actual or projected costs of administering falconry regulations and
shall not exceed $250.
(15) May establish special fishing and  hunting seasons and bag limits applicable only to persons
with disabilities.
(16) May  adopt optimum populations for deer and elk consistent with ORS 496.012. These popu-
lation levels shall be reviewed at least once every five years.
(17) Shall establish a preference system so that individuals  who are unsuccessful in controlled
hunt permit drawings for  deer and elk hunting have reasonable assurance of success in those
drawings in subsequent years. In establishing  the preference system, the commission shall consider
giving additional preference points to persons who have been  issued a resident annual pioneer
combination license pursuant to ORS 497.132 or resident disabled veteran hunting license under ORS
497.102.
(18) May sell advertising in  State Department of Fish and Wildlife publications, including annual
hunting and angling regulation publications.
(19) May, notwithstanding the fees required by ORS 497.112, provide free  hunting tags to an
organization that sponsors hunting trips  for terminally ill children. Except as provided under ORS
497.116, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife may not issue more than 15 tags  annually under
this subsection.
(20) Shall, after  consultation with the State Department of Agriculture, adopt rules prohibiting
the use of the World Wide Web, other Internet  protocols or broadcast or closed circuit media to
remotely control a weapon for  the purpose of hunting any game bird, wildlife, game mammal or
other mammal. The  rules may exempt the State Department of Fish and Wildlife or agents of the
department from the prohibition.
(21) May adopt rules establishing a schedule of civil  penalties, not to exceed $6,500 per vio-
lation, for  violations of provisions of the wildlife laws or rules adopted by the commission under the
wildlife laws. Civil penalties established under this subsection must be imposed in the  manner pro-
vided by ORS 183.745  and must be deposited in the State Wildlife Fund established under ORS
496.300.
(22) May by rule  impose a surcharge not to exceed $25 for the renewal of a hunting license on
any person who fails to comply with mandatory hunting  reporting requirements. Amounts collected
as surcharges under  this subsection must be deposited in the State Wildlife Fund established under
ORS 496.300.
(23)(a) May by rule establish annual and  daily Columbia Basin salmon, steelhead and
sturgeon recreational fishing endorsements with a fee not to exceed  $9.75 per annual license
and $1 per day per daily license. An endorsement  is required to fish for salmon, steelhead
or sturgeon in  portions of the Columbia Basin as designated by rule and is in addition to and
not in lieu of angling licenses  and tags required under the wildlife laws. Amounts collected
as fees under this subsection must be  deposited in the Columbia River Fisheries Enhance-
ment Fund established under section 7, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, if the commission adopts rules that
decrease fishery  impacts or the share of salmon allocated to Columbia River recreational
fisheries or that expand the areas and seasons where nontribal gillnets are permitted in
mainstem lower Columbia River nontribal fisheries as compared to  regulatory restrictions
in place from 2017 to 2020, the commission may not require or collect the endorsements,
beginning in the following calendar year.
[(23)] (24)  May by rule establish multiyear licenses and may prescribe fees for such licenses.
Fees prescribed by the commission for multiyear licenses may provide for a discount from the annual
license fees that would otherwise be payable for the period  of time covered by the multiyear license.
Enrolled Senate Bill 59 (SB 59-A) Page 3
[(24)] (25)  May by rule establish a program to offer unique fishing opportunities through
drawings, raffles or auctions and charge application and participation fees for the program.
SECTION 4.  Section 11, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 11.  The amendments to ORS 496.146 by section 10 , [of this 2013 Act ] chapter 672, Oregon
Laws 2013, and section 3 of this 2021 Act become operative on [ January 2, 2022 ] the effective
date of this 2021 Act .
SECTION 5.  ORS  496.146, as amended by section 10, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013, section
52, chapter 629, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 8, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, section 4, chapter 100,
Oregon Laws 2018, section 2, chapter  82, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 3 of this 2021 Act, is
amended to read:
496.146. In addition to any other duties or powers provided  by law, the State Fish and Wildlife
Commission:
(1) May accept, from  whatever source, appropriations, gifts or grants of money or other property
for the purposes of  wildlife management, and use such money or property for wildlife management
purposes.
(2) May sell or exchange property owned by  the state and used for wildlife management pur-
poses when the commission determines that such  sale or exchange would be advantageous to the
state wildlife policy and management programs.
(3) May acquire, introduce, propagate and stock wildlife species in  such manner as the com-
mission determines will carry out the state wildlife policy and management programs.
(4) May by rule authorize the issuance  of such licenses, tags and permits for angling, taking,
hunting and trapping  and may prescribe such tagging and sealing procedures as the commission
determines necessary  to carry out the provisions of the wildlife laws or to obtain information for
use in  wildlife management. Permits issued pursuant to this subsection may include special hunting
permits for a person and immediate family members of the person to hunt on land owned by that
person in areas where permits for deer or elk are limited by quota. As used in  this subsection,
“immediate family members” means spouses in a  marriage, parents, brothers, brothers-in-law, sisters,
sisters-in-law, sons, sons-in-law, daughters, daughters-in-law, stepchildren and grandchildren. A
landowner who is qualified to receive landowner preference tags from  the commission may request
two additional tags for providing  public access and two additional tags for wildlife habitat programs.
This request shall be made to the  Access and Habitat Board with supporting evidence that the ac-
cess is significant and the  habitat programs benefit wildlife. The board may recommend that the
commission grant the request. When a landowner is qualified under landowner preference rules
adopted by the commission and receives a controlled hunt tag for that unit or  a landowner prefer-
ence tag for the landowner’s  property and does not use the tag during the regular season, the
landowner may use that tag to take an antlerless animal, when approved by the State  Department
of Fish and Wildlife, to alleviate damage that is presently occurring to the landowner’s property.
(5) May by rule prescribe procedures requiring the holder of any  license, tag or permit issued
pursuant to the wildlife laws to keep  records and make reports concerning the time, manner and
place  of  taking wildlife, the quantities taken and such other information as the commission deter-
mines necessary for proper enforcement  of the wildlife laws or to obtain information for use in
wildlife management.
(6) May establish special hunting and angling areas or seasons in which only persons  less than
18 years of age or over 65 years of age are permitted to hunt or angle.
(7) May acquire by purchase, lease, agreement or gift real  property and all appropriate interests
therein for wildlife management and wildlife-oriented recreation purposes.
(8) May acquire by purchase, lease, agreement, gift, exercise of eminent  domain or otherwise
real property and  all interests therein and establish, operate and maintain thereon public hunting
areas.
(9) May establish and develop wildlife refuge and management  areas and prescribe rules gov-
erning the use of such areas and the use of wildlife refuge and management areas  established and
developed pursuant to any other provision of law.
Enrolled Senate Bill 59 (SB 59-A) Page 4
(10) May by rule  prescribe fees for licenses, tags, permits and applications issued or required
pursuant to the wildlife laws, and user charges for angling, hunting or  other recreational uses of
lands owned or managed by the commission, unless such fees or user charges are otherwise  pre-
scribed by law.  No fee or user charge prescribed by the commission pursuant to this subsection shall
exceed $250.
(11) May enter into contracts with  any person or governmental agency for the development and
encouragement of wildlife research and management programs and projects.
(12) May perform  such acts as may be necessary for the establishment and implementation of
cooperative wildlife management programs with agencies of the federal government.
(13) May offer and pay rewards for the arrest and conviction of any person who has  violated
any of the wildlife laws. No such reward shall exceed $1,000 for any one arrest and conviction.
(14) May by rule prescribe fees  for falconry licenses issued pursuant to the wildlife laws, unless
such fees are otherwise prescribed by law. Fees prescribed by the commission pursuant to  this
subsection shall be based on actual or projected costs of administering falconry regulations and
shall not exceed $250.
(15) May establish special fishing and  hunting seasons and bag limits applicable only to persons
with disabilities.
(16) May  adopt optimum populations for deer and elk consistent with ORS 496.012. These popu-
lation levels shall be reviewed at least once every five years.
(17) Shall establish a preference system so that individuals  who are unsuccessful in controlled
hunt permit drawings for  deer and elk hunting have reasonable assurance of success in those
drawings in subsequent years. In establishing  the preference system, the commission shall consider
giving additional preference points to persons who have been  issued a resident annual pioneer
combination license pursuant to ORS 497.132 or resident disabled veteran hunting license under ORS
497.102.
(18) May sell advertising in  State Department of Fish and Wildlife publications, including annual
hunting and angling regulation publications.
(19) May, notwithstanding the fees required by ORS 497.112, provide free  hunting tags to an
organization that sponsors hunting trips  for terminally ill children. Except as provided under ORS
497.116, the State Department of Fish and Wildlife may not issue more than 15 tags  annually under
this subsection.
(20) Shall, after  consultation with the State Department of Agriculture, adopt rules prohibiting
the use of the World Wide Web, other Internet  protocols or broadcast or closed circuit media to
remotely control a weapon for  the purpose of hunting any game bird, wildlife, game mammal or
other mammal. The  rules may exempt the State Department of Fish and Wildlife or agents of the
department from the prohibition.
(21) May adopt rules establishing a schedule of civil  penalties, not to exceed $6,500 per vio-
lation, for  violations of provisions of the wildlife laws or rules adopted by the commission under the
wildlife laws. Civil penalties established under this subsection must be imposed in the  manner pro-
vided by ORS 183.745  and must be deposited in the State Wildlife Fund established under ORS
496.300.
(22) May by rule  impose a surcharge not to exceed $25 for the renewal of a hunting license on
any person who fails to comply with mandatory hunting  reporting requirements. Amounts collected
as surcharges under  this subsection must be deposited in the State Wildlife Fund established under
ORS 496.300.
[(23)(a) May by  rule establish annual and daily Columbia Basin salmon, steelhead and sturgeon
recreational fishing endorsements with a fee not to exceed  $9.75 per annual license and $1 per day per
daily license. An endorsement is  required to fish for salmon, steelhead or sturgeon in portions of the
Columbia Basin as designated by rule  and is in addition to and not in lieu of angling licenses and tags
required under the wildlife laws. Amounts collected as fees under this subsection must be deposited
in the Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund established under section 7, chapter 672,  Oregon
Laws 2013.]
Enrolled Senate Bill 59 (SB 59-A) Page 5
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this  subsection, if the commission adopts rules that decrease
fishery impacts or the share of salmon allocated to Columbia River recreational fisheries or that  ex-
pand the areas and  seasons where nontribal gillnets are permitted in mainstem lower Columbia River
nontribal fisheries as compared to regulatory restrictions  in place from 2017 to 2020, the commission
may not require or collect the endorsements, beginning in the following calendar year. ]
[(24)] (23) May by rule establish multiyear licenses and may prescribe fees for such licenses.
Fees prescribed by the commission for multiyear licenses may provide for a discount from the annual
license fees that would otherwise be payable for the period  of time covered by the multiyear license.
[(25)] (24) May by rule establish a program to offer unique fishing opportunities through
drawings, raffles or auctions and charge application and participation fees for the program.
SECTION 6.
The amendments to ORS 496.146 by section  5 of this 2021 Act become oper-
ative on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 7.  Section 22, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 22.  [ For the period beginning January 1, 2016, and ending December 31, 2021, ] The youth
license under [ section 21 of this 2015  Act ] ORS 497.127 and the pioneer combination license under
ORS 497.132 [shall] include authorization for the purchaser to engage in angling activities  for which
an endorsement to fish for salmon, steelhead or sturgeon in the Columbia Basin under ORS 496.146
is required.
SECTION 8.
Section 22, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015, is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 9. This 2021 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate April 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 59 (SB 59-A) Page 6